District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1111

Proceedings to charge relatives legally responsible for maintenance of public patient; collection of maintenance payments; enforcement of order; liability of decedent’s estate.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 769, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(g)(1)(A), (6)
Oct. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 1087, Pub. L. 91-490, § 2(a)(1), (2), (6)
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(m), 45 DCR 745
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(e)(6), 59 DCR 5567

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-1111.
1973 Ed., § 21-1111.

References in Text

Section 21-1108A, referred to in the first sentence of subsection (a), was repealed by the Act of March 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604(a)(1).

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.